Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-2506
Commission; members; compensation; expenses.

The members of the commission shall each receive fifty dollars for each day spent in the performance of their duties and shall receive reimbursement for expenses as provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.

Laws 1971, LB 904, § 5;

Laws 1973, LB 37, § 2;

Laws 1981, LB 204, § 191;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 81-1218;

Laws 1991, LB 114, § 2;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 128.